Missouri, session 2026, HB1851.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 67, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 67.488, to read as follows:
67.488. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Building Permit
Reform Act".
2. For purposes of this section, the term "exempt homeowner" means a resident,
noncorporate owner of a detached, single-family residence.
3. (1) No political subdivision shall require an exempt homeowner to obtain any
license, certification, or professional registration or submit to any examination or testing
as a condition of applying for or using a building or construction permit, provided all
work is performed by the owner or other current resident.
(2) If an exempt homeowner transfers ownership of the property within one year
of completing any work performed under the provisions of this subsection, the relevant
political subdivision is permitted to assess a one-time administrative fee in an amount
not to exceed five thousand dollars. The homeowner shall be informed of this potential
administrative fee at the time of permit application.
(3) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the enforcement of
any applicable building codes or relevant inspections as otherwise required by
ordinance or law.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1851 2
(4) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit an owner from
hiring a contractor otherwise authorized by law to perform work on behalf of the owner.
(5) The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to:
(a) Any structure being rented, leased, subleased, or otherwise occupied outside
of the owner's principal residence;
(b) Any gas appliance installation or repair or any work that requires the
installation or modification of any device or delivery system that utilizes a combustible
fuel source; or
(c) The act of making a direct connection to publicly provided water or sewer
service, or the modification to such existing connections at the point of service.
4. No political subdivision shall require any permit, license, variance, or other
type of prior approval for an exempt homeowner to perform any of the following
activities, provided all work is performed by the owner or other current resident:
(1) Replacing an existing electric appliance with a substantially similar one,
provided no major additions or modifications to existing building wiring are performed;
(2) Replacing an existing sink, faucet, or dishwasher, provided no major
modifications to existing building plumbing are performed;
(3) Repairing, replacing, or installing gypsum board, plaster, or any other
nonstructural interior wall covering or cladding; and
(4) Repairing, replacing, or installing carpet, tile, vinyl, or other floor coverings.
5. Any political subdivision that fails to perform an inspection under a permit
within ten business days of a request made by an exempt homeowner shall refund fifty
percent of any charges assessed for the permit. If the inspection is not performed within
twenty business days from the initial request, the political subdivision shall waive the
inspection requirements and allow the exempt homeowner to proceed as if the exempt
homeowner had passed the inspection.
6. No exempt homeowner shall be charged a fee to extend or renew an expiring
building or construction permit, provided the permit is not allowed to expire prior to
renewal. No limit shall be placed on the number of extensions or renewals of permits
issued to exempt homeowners unless the work being performed is visible from
neighboring properties or adjacent streets. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed
to prohibit a political subdivision from requiring job sites with uncompleted work to be
maintained in a state that does not pose an imminent threat to public health or safety.
7. No exempt homeowner shall be assessed a fine or fee for work done without a
permit in an amount greater than double the charge that would have been assessed if the
permit had been issued at the time the unpermitted work was discovered.

HB 1851 3
8. No exempt homeowner shall be required to destroy, remove, or substantially
alter any structure or part of a structure upon which work was previously done without
permits unless the political subdivision having jurisdiction can demonstrate through
photographic or similar objective evidence that the work performed did not meet
applicable building codes or safety standards in place at the time the work was
performed.
9. (1) No political subdivision shall issue a stop-work order, citation, penalty, or
requirement for remediation for any ordinance or building code violation discovered
during an inspection if the violation found is outside the scope of work that was
requested to be inspected.
(2) Nothing in this subsection shall be interpreted to prohibit the production of a
report detailing such violations found, provided the report is provided directly to the
homeowner for informational purposes only and is not retained or otherwise utilized or
distributed by the political subdivision or its agents.
10. Any exempt homeowner who applies for any building or construction permit
and subsequently fails an inspection performed pursuant to such permit shall be
informed in writing as to the reasons the inspection was deemed a failure and the actions
required to be taken to pass a follow-up inspection.
11. No exempt homeowner shall be assessed a charge to reinspect previously
inspected work for an amount that exceeds the cost of the initial permit or inspection
unless a period of over ninety days has elapsed since the original inspection.
12. If the state or any of its political subdivisions enacts a statute, ordinance, or
administrative rule that incorporates by reference any third-party standard or code
otherwise subject to copyright protection, the state or political subdivision responsible
for the statute, ordinance, or administrative rule shall provide, upon request and free of
charge in a digital or physical format, the third-party standard or code incorporated by
reference. Access to a physical format in a temporary or time-limited manner is
sufficient to meet the requirements of this subsection, provided that a physical copy may
remain in the possession of the requester until the completion of any currently permitted
work. The state or political subdivision shall pay all costs associated with providing the
third-party standard or code, except that the state or political subdivision may
alternatively declare by executive or administrative act that the provisions of the
standard or code incorporated by reference shall be repealed and not enforced until
such repeal is achieved.
13. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no agent of a
political subdivision shall have the authority to enter into a private residence for the
purpose of performing a safety inspection or investigation into municipal or code

HB 1851 4
violations without first securing permission from the property owner or the owner's
designee or a warrant from a court of competent jurisdiction.
14. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require any political subdivision
to enact any building codes or standards where none currently exist.
✔